Vermont, session 2025-2026, H815.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4072 is amended to read:
§ 4072. MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
SERVICES
* * *
(c) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for treatment of a mental
condition and shall:
(1) not establish any rate, term, or condition that places a greater burden
on a covered individual for access to treatment for a mental condition than for
access to treatment for other health conditions, including no greater co-
payment for primary mental health care or services than the co-payment
applicable to care or services provided by a primary care provider under a
covered individual’s health insurance plan and no greater co-payment for
specialty mental health care or services than the co-payment applicable to care
or services provided by a specialist provider under a covered individual’s
health insurance plan;
(2) not exclude from its network or list of authorized providers any
licensed mental health or substance use disorder treatment provider located
within the geographic coverage area of the health insurance plan if the provider
is willing to meet the terms and conditions for participation established by the
health insurer;
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 3 of 9
(3) not reduce the reimbursement rate for more than one mental health
code for the same mental health professional license type in any contract year
below the reimbursement rate provided for that code and license type in the
previous contract year;
(4) make any deductible or out-of-pocket limits required under a health
insurance plan comprehensive for coverage of both mental and physical health
conditions; and
(4)(5) if the health insurance plan provides prescription drug coverage,
ensure that at least one medication in each therapeutic class approved by the
U.S. Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of substance use
disorder, including for opioid use disorder, methadone, buprenorphine, and
naltrexone, is available on the lowest cost-sharing tier of the plan’s
prescription drug formulary.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9418h is added to read:
§ 9418h. MODIFICATIONS TO REIMBURSEMENT AND CODING
POLICIES FOR CERTAIN SERVICES AND PROVIDERS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this subchapter to the contrary, a
health plan shall not implement any change to reimbursement methodology,
billing policy, coding alignment, supervised billing requirements, or service
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 4 of 9
authorization requirements affecting mental health, substance use disorder, or
intellectual or developmental disability services without first:
(1) publicly identifying whether the change is required by federal or
State law and, if so, citing the specific federal or State statute, regulation, or
rule that requires the change;
(2) publicly identifying which elements of the change, if any, are
discretionary policy choices;
(3) publishing the proposed policy language and billing guidance on its
website, and sending written notice directly to providers, including
independent mental health providers, designated and specialized service
agencies, relevant advocacy organizations, and representatives of individuals
and families of individuals who receive services that will be affected by the
change, and the Department of Financial Regulation, at least 90 days prior to
implementation;
(4) conducting at least one public stakeholder meeting and soliciting
public comments; and
(5) publishing on its website a written response describing the ways in
which stakeholder input and public comments were considered and
incorporated.
(b) Prior to implementing any reimbursement or coding policy change
described in subsection (a) of this section, the health plan shall:
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 5 of 9
(1) conduct and publicly release a fiscal impact analysis;
(2) conduct and publicly release an assessment of the impact on access
to care and on the provider workforce, demonstrating that the change will not
reduce service availability; and
(3) consult with affected providers, the Office of the Health Care
Advocate, Disability Rights Vermont, and representatives of individuals and
families of individuals who receive services that will be affected by the
change.
(c)(1) For 12 months following implementation of a reimbursement or
coding policy change described in subsection (a) of this section, the health plan
shall monitor and shall post on its website and report to the Department of
Financial Regulation quarterly on access indicators, including:
(A) provider network participation and withdrawal;
(B) wait times for services; and
(C) service denial rates and service reductions.
(2) If monitoring demonstrates a reduction in access, the health plan
shall take corrective action to restore the access levels that were in effect prior
to the policy change.
(d)(1) The Department of Financial Regulation shall provide written notice
to the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare at least 60 days prior to
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 6 of 9
implementation of any policy or reimbursement change affecting mental
health, substance use disorder, or intellectual or developmental disability
services that does one more of the following:
(A) reduces or is reasonably expected to reduce provider
reimbursement;
(B) increases uncompensated administrative or supervision
requirements; or
(C) is reasonably expected to increase wait times, reduce provider
participation, or reduce availability of services, regardless of whether the
change is described as coding alignment, billing clarification, compliance
update, policy modernization, or otherwise.
(2) The notice shall include the fiscal analysis, access impact
assessment, and stakeholder engagement documentation required by this
section.
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 1905b is added to read:
§ 1905b. MODIFICATIONS TO REIMBURSEMENT AND CODING
POLICIES FOR CERTAIN SERVICES AND PROVIDERS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this subchapter to the contrary, the
Department of Vermont Health Access shall not implement any change to
Medicaid reimbursement methodology, billing policy, coding alignment,
supervised billing requirements, or service authorization requirements
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 7 of 9
affecting mental health, substance use disorder, or intellectual or
developmental disability services without first:
(1) publicly identifying whether the change is required by federal or
State law and, if so, citing the specific federal or State statute, regulation, or
rule that requires the change;
(2) publicly identifying which elements of the change, if any, are
discretionary policy choices;
(3) publishing the proposed policy language and billing guidance on the
Department’s website and sending written notice directly to providers,
including independent mental health providers, designated and specialized
service agencies, relevant advocacy organizations, and representatives of
individuals and families of individuals who receive services that will be
affected by the change at least 90 days prior to implementation;
(4) conducting at least one public stakeholder meeting and soliciting
public comments; and
(5) publishing on the Department’s website a written response
describing the ways in which stakeholder input and public comments were
considered and incorporated.
(b) Prior to implementing any Medicaid reimbursement or coding policy
change described in subsection (a) of this section, the Department of Vermont
Health Access shall:
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 8 of 9
(1) conduct and publicly release a fiscal impact analysis;
(2) conduct and publicly release an assessment of the impact on access
to care and on the provider workforce, demonstrating that the change will not
reduce service availability; and
(3) consult with affected providers, the Office of the Health Care
Advocate, Disability Rights Vermont, and representatives of individuals and
families of individuals who receive services that will be affected by the
change.
(c)(1) For 12 months following implementation of a reimbursement or
coding policy change described in subsection (a) of this section, the
Department of Vermont Health Access shall post quarterly reports on its
website showing updated access indicators, including:
(A) provider network participation and withdrawal;
(B) wait times for services; and
(C) service denial rates and service reductions.
(2) If monitoring demonstrates a reduction in access, the Department
shall take corrective action to restore the access levels that were in effect prior
to the policy change.
(d)(1) The Department of Vermont Health Access shall provide written
notice to the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and
the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare at least 60 days prior to
VT LEG #386147 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.815
2026 Page 9 of 9
implementation of any Medicaid policy or reimbursement change affecting
mental health, substance use disorder, or intellectual or developmental
disability services that does one more of the following:
(A) reduces or is reasonably expected to reduce provider
reimbursement;
(B) increases uncompensated administrative or supervision
requirements; or
(C) is reasonably expected to increase wait times, reduce provider
participation, or reduce availability of services, regardless of whether the
change is described as coding alignment, billing clarification, compliance
update, policy modernization, or otherwise.
(2) The notice shall include the fiscal analysis, access impact
assessment, and stakeholder engagement documentation required by this
section.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 1 (8 V.S.A. § 4072; mental health reimbursement rates) shall take
effect on January 1, 2027.
(b) The remaining sections shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386147 v.1